Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,306
Authorized representative; access to property; obstruction; prohibited.

No person shall refuse entry to, or access by, an authorized representative of the department to property for the purpose of responding to a release of a pollutant or cleanup of a release if such authorized representative presents appropriate credentials. No person shall hamper or obstruct an authorized representative of the department that is responding, or taking action, to clean up a release of a pollutant.

Laws 2022, LB1102, § 6.